District of Columbia statutes.
29-513

Disqualified professional.

If any individual rendering professional services on behalf of a professional corporation assumes a public office that prohibits his or her rendering of the professional services, or for any other reason is disqualified by law to render the professional services, the individual immediately shall sever all employment relationships in which the individual shares in the corporation’s profits attributable to professional services rendered after such assumption of office or other disqualification. For the purposes of § 29-514, the individual shall be referred to as a “disqualified shareholder”.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-1115.
1981 Ed., § 29-615.
2001 Ed., § 29-415.